North Carolina, session 2025, SB123.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) G.S. 115C-47(29a) reads as rewritten:
"(29a) To Require the Display of the United States and North Carolina Flags, and to
Require the Recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance. – Local boards of
education shall adopt policies to (i) require the display of the United States
and North Carolina flags on school grounds near the main entrance to each
school and in each classroom, when available, (ii) require that recitation of the
Pledge of Allegiance be scheduled on a daily basis, and (iii) provide
age-appropriate instruction on the meaning and historical origins of the flag
and the Pledge of Allegiance. These policies shall not compel any person to
stand, salute the flag, or recite the Pledge of Allegiance. If flags are donated
or are otherwise available, flags shall be displayed in each classroom."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 115C-150.12C(23), as enacted by S.L. 2023-10, reads as
rewritten:
"(23) The Display of the United States and North Carolina Flags and the Recitation
of the Pledge of Allegiance. – The board of trustees shall adopt policies to (i)
require the display of the United States and North Carolina flags on school
grounds near the main entrance to the school and in each classroom when
available, classroom, (ii) require that recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance be
scheduled on a daily basis, and (iii) provide age-appropriate instruction on the
meaning and historical origins of the flag and the Pledge of Allegiance. These
policies shall not compel any person to stand, salute the flag, or recite the
Pledge of Allegiance. If flags are donated or are otherwise available, flags
shall be displayed in each classroom."
SECTION 1.(c) G.S. 115C-218.80 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-218.80. Display of the United States and North Carolina flags and the recitation
of the Pledge of Allegiance.
A charter school shall (i) display the United States and North Carolina flags on school
grounds near the main entrance to the school and in each classroom when available, classroom,
(ii) require the schedule recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance on a daily basis, and (iii) provide
age-appropriate instruction on the meaning and historical origins of the flag and the Pledge of
Allegiance. A charter school shall not compel any person to stand, salute the flag, or recite the
*S123-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Pledge of Allegiance. If flags are donated or are otherwise available, flags shall be displayed in
each classroom."
SECTION 1.(d) G.S. 115C-238.66 is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(23) Display of the United States and North Carolina flags and the recitation of the
Pledge of Allegiance. – A regional school shall (i) display the United States
and North Carolina flags on school grounds near the main entrance to the
school and in each classroom, (ii) schedule recitation of the Pledge of
Allegiance on a daily basis, and (iii) provide age-appropriate instruction on
the meaning and historical origins of the flag and the Pledge of Allegiance. A
regional school shall not compel any person to stand, salute the flag, or recite
the Pledge of Allegiance."
SECTION 1.(e) G.S. 116-69.1 reads as rewritten:
"§ 116-69.1. Display of the United States and North Carolina flags and the recitation of the
Pledge of Allegiance.
The school shall (i) display the United States and North Carolina flags on school grounds
near the main entrance to the school and in each classroom when available, classroom, (ii) require
the schedule recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance on a daily basis, and (iii) provide
age-appropriate instruction on the meaning and historical origins of the flag and the Pledge of
Allegiance. The school shall not compel any person to stand, salute the flag, or recite the Pledge
of Allegiance. If flags are donated or are otherwise available, flags shall be displayed in each
classroom."
SECTION 1.(f) G.S. 116-235(i) reads as rewritten:
"(i) The Display of the United States and North Carolina Flags and the Recitation of the
Pledge of Allegiance. – The Board of Trustees shall adopt policies to require (i) require the
display of the United States and North Carolina flags on school grounds near the main entrance
to the school and in each classroom when available, classroom, (ii) the schedule recitation of the
Pledge of Allegiance on a daily basis, and (iii) the provide age-appropriate instruction on the
meaning and historical origins of the flag and the Pledge of Allegiance. These policies shall not
compel any person to stand, salute the flag, or recite the Pledge of Allegiance. If flags are donated
or are otherwise available, flags shall be displayed in each classroom."
SECTION 1.(g) G.S. 116-239.8(b) is amended by adding a new subdivision to read:
"(26) Display of the United States and North Carolina flags and the recitation of the
Pledge of Allegiance. – Laboratory schools shall (i) display the United States
and North Carolina flags on school grounds near the main entrance to the
school and in each classroom, (ii) schedule recitation of the Pledge of
Allegiance on a daily basis, and (iii) provide age-appropriate instruction on
the meaning and historical origins of the flag and the Pledge of Allegiance. A
laboratory school shall not compel any person to stand, salute the flag, or
recite the Pledge of Allegiance."
SECTION 2.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of one million dollars ($1,000,000) in nonrecurring funds for the
2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in recurring funds
for the 2026-2027 fiscal year for the Department to allocate to public school units for the purchase
of United States and North Carolina flags to be displayed as required by this act.
SECTION 2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Board of
Governors of The University of North Carolina the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) in
recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year for the Board to allocate to the secondary schools
operated under control of the Board for the purchase of United States and North Carolina flags
to be displayed as required by this act.
SECTION 3. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning with
the 2025-2026 school year.
Page 2 Senate Bill 123-First Edition